California, session 20252026, SB861.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:27. (a) Each entity specified in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) shall provide on the internet information regarding the status of every license issued by that entity in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). The public information to be provided on the internet shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses issued by the entity and other related enforcement action, including accusations filed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) taken by the entity relative to persons, businesses, or facilities subject to licensure or regulation by the entity. The information may not include personal information, including home telephone number, date of birth, or social security number. Each entity shall disclose a licensee’s address of record. However, each entity shall allow a licensee to provide a post office box number or other alternate address, instead of the licensee’s home address, as the address of record. This section shall not preclude an entity from also requiring a licensee, who has provided a post office box number or other alternative mailing address as the licensee’s address of record, to provide a physical business address or residence address only for the entity’s internal administrative use and not for disclosure as the licensee’s address of record or disclosure on the internet.(b) In providing information on the internet, each entity specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall comply with the Department of Consumer Affairs’ guidelines for access to public records.(c) Each of the following entities within the Department of Consumer Affairs shall comply with the requirements of this section:(1) The Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists shall disclose information on its registrants and licensees.(2) The Bureau of Automotive Repair shall disclose information on its licensees, including automotive repair dealers, smog check stations, smog check inspectors and repair technicians, and vehicle safety systems inspection stations and technicians.(3) The Bureau of Household Goods and Services shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.(4) The Cemetery and Funeral Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees, including cemetery brokers, cemetery salespersons, cemetery managers, crematory managers, cemetery authorities, crematories, cremated remains disposers, embalmers, funeral establishments, hydrolysis facilities, reduction facilities, and funeral directors.(5) The Professional Fiduciaries Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees.(6) The Contractors State License Board shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3. In addition to information related to licenses as specified in subdivision (a), the board shall also disclose information provided to the board by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.9 of the Labor Code.(7) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education shall disclose information on private postsecondary institutions under its jurisdiction, including disclosure of notices to comply issued pursuant to Section 94935 of the Education Code.(8) The California Board of Accountancy shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(9) The California Architects Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including architects and landscape architects.(10) The State Athletic Commission shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(11) The State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology shall disclose information on its licensees.(12) The Acupuncture Board shall disclose information on its licensees.(13) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(14) The Dental Board of California shall disclose information on its licensees.(15) The California State Board of Optometry shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(16) The Board of Psychology shall disclose information on its licensees, including psychologists and registered psychological associates.(17) The Veterinary Medical Board shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.(d) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall disclose information on its licensees.(e) The Structural Pest Control Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including applicators, field representatives, and operators in the areas of fumigation, general pest and wood destroying pests and organisms, and wood roof cleaning and treatment.(f) “Internet” for the purposes of this section has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.SEC. 1.5. Section 27 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:27. (a) Each entity specified in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) shall provide on the internet information regarding the status of every license issued by that entity in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code). The public information to be provided on the internet shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses issued by the entity and other related enforcement action, including accusations filed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) taken by the entity relative to persons, businesses, or facilities subject to licensure or regulation by the entity. The information may not include personal information, including home telephone number, date of birth, or social security number. Each entity shall disclose a licensee’s address of record. However, each entity shall allow a licensee to provide a post office box number or other alternate address, instead of the licensee’s home address, as the address of record. This section shall not preclude an entity from also requiring a licensee, who has provided a post office box number or other alternative mailing address as the licensee’s address of record, to provide a physical business address or residence address only for the entity’s internal administrative use and not for disclosure as the licensee’s address of record or disclosure on the internet.(b) In providing information on the internet, each entity specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) shall comply with the Department of Consumer Affairs’ guidelines for access to public records.(c) Each of the following entities within the Department of Consumer Affairs shall comply with the requirements of this section:(1) The Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists shall disclose information on its registrants and licensees.(2) The Bureau of Automotive Repair shall disclose information on its licensees, including automotive repair dealers, smog check stations, smog check inspectors and repair technicians, and vehicle safety systems inspection stations and technicians.(3) The Bureau of Household Goods and Services shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.(4) The Cemetery and Funeral Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees, including cemetery brokers, cemetery salespersons, cemetery managers, crematory managers, cemetery authorities, crematories, cremated remains disposers, embalmers, funeral establishments, hydrolysis facilities, reduction facilities, and funeral directors.(5) The Professional Fiduciaries Bureau shall disclose information on its licensees.(6) The Contractors State License Board shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3. In addition to information related to licenses as specified in subdivision (a), the board shall also disclose information provided to the board by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.9 of the Labor Code.(7) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education shall disclose information on private postsecondary institutions under its jurisdiction, including disclosure of notices to comply issued pursuant to Section 94935 of the Education Code.(8) The California Board of Accountancy shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(9) The California Architects Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including architects and landscape architects.(10) The State Athletic Commission shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(11) The State Board of Barbering and Cosmetology shall disclose information on its licensees.(12) The Acupuncture Board shall disclose information on its licensees.(13) The Board of Behavioral Sciences shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(14) The Dental Board of California shall disclose information on its licensees.(15) The California State Board of Optometry shall disclose information on its licensees and registrants.(16) The Board of Psychology shall disclose information on its licensees, including psychologists and registered psychological associates, psychological testing technicians, research psychoanalysts, and student research psychoanalysts.(17) The Veterinary Medical Board shall disclose information on its licensees, registrants, and permitholders.(d) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall disclose information on its licensees.(e) The Structural Pest Control Board shall disclose information on its licensees, including applicators, field representatives, and operators in the areas of fumigation, general pest and wood destroying pests and organisms, and wood roof cleaning and treatment.(f) “Internet” for the purposes of this section has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.SEC. 2. Section 144 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:144. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, an agency designated in subdivision (b) shall require an applicant to furnish to the agency a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting criminal history record checks. Any agency designated in subdivision (b) may obtain and receive, at its discretion, criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following:(1) California Board of Accountancy.(2) State Athletic Commission.(3) Board of Behavioral Sciences.(4) Court Reporters Board of California.(5) Dental Board of California.(6) California State Board of Pharmacy.(7) Board of Registered Nursing.(8) California Veterinary Medical Board.(9) Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.(10) Respiratory Care Board of California.(11) Physical Therapy Board of California.(12) Physician Assistant Board.(13) Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.(14) Medical Board of California.(15) California State Board of Optometry.(16) Acupuncture Board.(17) Cemetery and Funeral Bureau.(18) Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.(19) Division of Investigation.(20) Board of Psychology.(21) California Board of Occupational Therapy.(22) Structural Pest Control Board.(23) Contractors State License Board.(24) California Board of Naturopathic Medicine.(25) Professional Fiduciaries Bureau.(26) Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists.(27) Podiatric Medical Board of California.(28) Osteopathic Medical Board of California.(29) California Architects Board, beginning January 1, 2021.(30) Landscape Architects Technical Committee, beginning January 1, 2022.(31) Bureau of Household Goods and Services with respect to household movers as described in Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8.(32) State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.(c) For purposes of paragraph (26) of subdivision (b), the term “applicant” shall be limited to an initial applicant who has never been registered or licensed by the board or to an applicant for a new licensure or registration category.SEC. 3. Section 1602 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1602. All of the members of the board, except the public members, shall have been actively and lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry in the State of California, for at least five years next preceding the date of their appointment. The registered dental assistant members shall have been a registered dental assistant, in the State of California for at least five years next preceding the date of their appointment. The public members shall not be licensees of the board or of any other board under this division or of any board referred to in Sections 1000 and 3600. No more than one member of the board shall be a member of the faculty of any dental college or dental department of any medical college in the State of California. None of the members, including the public members, shall have any financial interest in any such college.SEC. 4. Section 1603 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1603. (a) Except for the initial appointments, members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, and each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor or until one year shall have elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs.(b) A vacancy occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term, within 30 days after it occurs.(c) No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two terms.(d) The Governor shall appoint three of the public members, the two registered dental assistant members, and the eight licensed dentist members of the board. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.(e) Of the initial appointments, one of the dentist members and one of the public members appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of one year. Two of the dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve for a term of two years. One of the public members and two of the dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve a term of three years. The registered dental assistant members and the remaining three dentist members appointed by the Governor shall each serve for a term of four years. The public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each serve for a term of four years.SEC. 5. Section 1901 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1901. (a) There is hereby created in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Dental Hygiene Board of California in which the administration of this article is vested.(b) Whenever the terms “Dental Hygiene Committee of California” or “committee” are used in this article, they mean the Dental Hygiene Board of California.(c) Whenever the term “Dental Hygiene Committee of California” is used in any other law, it means the Dental Hygiene Board of California.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the dental hygiene board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.SEC. 6. Section 1903 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1903. (a) (1) The dental hygiene board shall consist of nine members as follows:(A) Seven members appointed by the Governor as follows:(i) Two members shall be public members.(ii) One member shall be a practicing general or public health dentist who holds a current license in California.(iii) Four members shall be registered dental hygienists who hold current licenses in California. Of the registered dental hygienist members, one shall be licensed either in alternative practice or in extended functions, one shall be a dental hygiene educator, and two shall be registered dental hygienists. No public member shall have been licensed under this chapter within five years of the date of their appointment or have any current financial interest in a dental-related business.(B) One public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.(C) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(2) The first appointment by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly pursuant to this subdivision shall be made upon the expiration of the term of a public member that is scheduled to occur, or otherwise occurs, on or after January 1, 2019.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a public health dentist is a dentist whose primary employer or place of employment is in any of the following:(A) A primary care clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.(B) A primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.(C) A clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system.(D) A clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), members of the dental hygiene board shall be appointed for a term of four years. Each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor or until one year shall have lapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever comes first.(2) For the term commencing on January 1, 2012, two of the public members, the general or public health dentist member, and two of the registered dental hygienist members, other than the dental hygiene educator member or the registered dental hygienist member licensed in alternative practice or in extended functions, shall each serve a term of two years, expiring January 1, 2014.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to subdivision (e), the Governor may appoint to the dental hygiene board a person who previously served as a member of the former committee or dental hygiene board even if the person’s previous term expired.(d) The dental hygiene board shall elect a president, a vice president, and a secretary from its membership.(e) No person shall serve as a member of the dental hygiene board for more than two consecutive terms.(f) A vacancy in the dental hygiene board shall be filled by appointment to the unexpired term.(g) Each member of the dental hygiene board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.(h) Each appointing authority shall have the power to remove from office at any time any member of the dental hygiene board appointed by that authority pursuant to Section 106.(i) The dental hygiene board, with the approval of the director, may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the dental hygiene board and vested in the executive officer by this article.(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 1905 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1905. (a) The dental hygiene board shall perform the following functions:(1) Evaluate all registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienist in extended functions educational programs that apply for approval and grant or deny approval of those applications in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board. Any such educational programs approved by the dental board on or before June 30, 2009, shall be deemed approved by the dental hygiene board. Any dental hygiene program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation may be approved.(2) Withdraw or revoke its prior approval of a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions educational program in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board may withdraw or revoke a dental hygiene program approval if the Commission on Dental Accreditation has indicated an intent to withdraw approval or has withdrawn approval.(3) Review and evaluate all registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienist in extended functions applications for licensure to ascertain whether the applicant meets the appropriate licensing requirements specified by statute and regulations, maintain application records, cashier application fees, issue and renew licenses, and perform any other tasks that are incidental to the application and licensure processes.(4) Determine the appropriate type of license examination consistent with the provisions of this article, and develop or cause to be developed and administer examinations in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board.(5) Determine the amount of fees assessed under this article, not to exceed the actual cost.(6) Determine and enforce the continuing education requirements specified in Section 1936.1.(7) Deny, suspend, or revoke a license under this article, or otherwise enforce the provisions of this article. Any such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the dental hygiene board shall have all of the powers granted therein.(8) Adopt, amend, and revoke rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article, including the amount of required supervision by a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions of a registered dental assistant.(b) The dental hygiene board may employ employees and examiners that it deems necessary to carry out its functions and responsibilities under this article.SEC. 8. Section 1926.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1926.3. (a) Every person who is now or hereafter licensed as a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice in this state shall register with the executive officer, on forms prescribed by the dental hygiene board within 30 calendar days, the physical facility of the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice or, if the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice has more than one physical facility pursuant to Section 1926.4, all of the physical facilities. If the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice does not have a physical facility, the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall notify the executive officer.(b) (1) A registered dental hygienist in alternative practice who utilizes portable equipment to practice dental hygiene shall register with the executive officer, on forms prescribed by the dental hygiene board, the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facility where the portable equipment is maintained.(2) The dental hygiene board may conduct announced and unannounced reviews and inspections of a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facilities and equipment described in paragraph (1) to ensure continued compliance with the requirements for continued approval under this article.(c) It shall constitute unprofessional conduct if the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice’s physical facility or equipment is found to be noncompliant with any requirements necessary for licensure and a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice may be placed on probation with terms, issued a citation and fine, or have the owned physical facility registration withdrawn if compliance is not demonstrated within reasonable timelines, as established by the dental hygiene board.(d) The dental hygiene board, by itself or through an authorized representative, may issue a citation containing fines and orders of abatement to the registered dental hygienist in alternative practice for any violation of this section, Section 1925, Section 1926.4, or any regulations adopted thereunder. Any fine collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State Dental Hygiene Fund established pursuant to Section 1944.SEC. 9. Section 1944 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1944. (a) The dental hygiene board shall establish by resolution the amount of the fees that relate to the licensing of a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and a registered dental hygienist in extended functions. The fees established by dental hygiene board resolution in effect on June 30, 2009, as they relate to the licensure of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienists in extended functions, shall remain in effect until modified by the dental hygiene board. The fees are subject to the following limitations:(1) The application fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).(2) The initial licensure fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150). (3) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.(4) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist in extended functions shall not exceed the actual cost of the examination.(5) The fee for examination for licensure as a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice shall not exceed the actual cost of administering the examination.(6) The biennial renewal fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).(7) The delinquency fee shall not exceed one-half of the renewal fee. Any delinquent license may be restored only upon payment of all fees, including the delinquency fee, and compliance with all other applicable requirements of this article.(8) The fee for issuance of a duplicate license to replace one that is lost or destroyed, or in the event of a name change, shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) or one-half of the renewal fee, whichever is greater.(9) The fee for certification of licensure shall not exceed one-half of the renewal fee.(10) The fee for each curriculum review and feasibility study review for educational programs for dental hygienists who are not accredited by a dental hygiene board-approved agency shall not exceed two thousand one hundred dollars ($2,100).(11) The fee for each review or approval of course requirements for licensure or procedures that require additional training shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).(12) The initial application and biennial fee for a provider of continuing education shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).(13) The amount of fees payable in connection with permits issued under Section 1962 is as follows:(A) The initial permit fee is an amount equal to the renewal fee for the applicant’s license to practice dental hygiene in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued.(B) If the permit will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the initial permit fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which the permit is issued.(14) The fee for the dental hygiene board to conduct a site visit to educational programs for a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions to ensure compliance of educational program requirements shall not exceed the actual cost incurred by the dental hygiene board for cost recovery of site visit expenditures.(15) The fee for a retired license shall not exceed one-half of the current license renewal fee.(b) The renewal and delinquency fees shall be fixed by the dental hygiene board by resolution at not more than the current amount of the renewal fee for a license to practice under this article nor less than five dollars ($5).(c) Fees fixed by the dental hygiene board by resolution pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the approval of the Office of Administrative Law.(d) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be collected by the dental hygiene board and deposited into the State Dental Hygiene Fund, which is hereby created. All money in this fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, shall be used to implement this article.(e) No fees or charges other than those listed in this section shall be levied by the dental hygiene board in connection with the licensure of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienists in extended functions.(f) The fee for registration of an extramural dental facility shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(g) The fee for registration of a mobile dental hygiene unit shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).(h) The biennial renewal fee for a mobile dental hygiene unit shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(i) The fee for an additional office permit shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(j) The biennial renewal fee for an additional office as described in Section 1926.4 shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(k) The initial application and biennial special permit fee is an amount equal to the biennial renewal fee specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a).(l) The fees in this section shall not exceed an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of carrying out this article.SEC. 10. Section 2532.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.2. Except as required by Section 2532.25, to be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, the applicant shall possess all of the following qualifications:(a) Possess at least a master’s degree in speech-language pathology or audiology from an educational institution approved by the board or qualifications deemed equivalent by the board.(b) (1) Submit evidence of the satisfactory completion of supervised clinical practice with individuals representative of a wide spectrum of ages and communication disorders. The board shall establish by regulation the required number of clock hours, not to exceed 375 clock hours, of supervised clinical practice necessary for the applicant.(2) The clinical practice shall be under the direction of an educational institution approved by the board.(c) Submit evidence of no less than 36 weeks of satisfactorily completed supervised professional full-time experience or 72 weeks of professional part-time experience obtained under the supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist or a speech-language pathologist or audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board. This experience shall be evaluated and approved by the board. The required professional experience shall follow completion of the requirements listed in subdivisions (a) and (b). Full time is defined as at least 36 weeks in a calendar year and a minimum of 30 hours per week. Part time is defined as a minimum of 72 weeks and a minimum of 15 hours per week.(d) (1) Pass an examination or examinations approved by the board. The board shall determine the subject matter and scope of the examinations and may waive the examination upon evidence that the applicant has successfully completed an examination approved by the board. Written examinations may be supplemented by oral examinations as the board shall determine. An applicant who fails their examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination upon payment of the reexamination fee required by this chapter.(2) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist who holds a license from another state or territory of the United States or who holds equivalent qualifications as determined by the board and who has completed no less than one year of full-time continuous employment as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist within the past three years is exempt from the supervised professional experience in subdivision (c).(e) As applied to licensure as an audiologist, this section shall apply to applicants who graduated from an approved educational institution on or before December 31, 2007.SEC. 11. Section 2532.3 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.3. (a) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to Section 2532.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (i) of Section 2534.2, the board may issue a temporary license for a period of six months from the date of issuance to a speech-language pathologist or audiologist who holds an unrestricted license from another state or territory of the United States or who holds equivalent qualifications as determined by the board and has made application to the board for a license in this state.(b) A temporary license shall terminate upon notice thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested, if it is issued by mistake or if the application for permanent licensure is denied.(c) Upon written application, the board may reissue a temporary license to any person who has applied for a regular renewable license pursuant to Section 2532.1, and who, in the judgment of the board, has been excusably delayed in completing their application or the minimum requirements for a regular license. The board may not reissue a temporary license more than twice to any one person.SEC. 12. Section 2532.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.4. (a) The board may direct applicants to be examined for knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in speech-language pathology or audiology it deems appropriate. It may examine the applicant with regard to their professional skills and their judgment in the utilization of speech-language pathology or audiology techniques and methods.(b) The examination may be written or oral or both. The examination shall be given at least once a year at the time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine. The board shall determine what shall constitute a passing grade.(c) The board shall keep an accurate recording of any oral examination and keep the recordings as well as any written examination as part of its records for at least two years following the date of examination.SEC. 13. Section 2532.6 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.6. (a) The Legislature recognizes that the education and experience requirements of this chapter constitute only minimal requirements to assure the public of professional competence. The Legislature encourages all professionals licensed and registered by the board under this chapter to regularly engage in continuing professional development and learning that is related and relevant to the professions of speech-language pathology and audiology.(b) The board shall not renew any license or registration pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board that they have completed in the preceding two years not less than the minimum number of continuing professional development hours established by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) for the professional practice authorized by their license or registration.(c) (1) The board shall prescribe the forms utilized for and the number of hours of required continuing professional development for persons licensed or registered under this chapter.(2) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing professional development requirements.(3) Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing professional development coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.(d) The board shall establish exceptions from the continuing professional development requirements of this section for good cause as defined by the board.(e) (1) The continuing professional development services shall be obtained from accredited institutions of higher learning, organizations approved as continuing education providers by either the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, the California Medical Association’s Institute for Medical Quality Continuing Medical Education Program, or other entities or organizations approved as continuing professional development providers by the board, in its discretion.(2) No hours shall be credited for any course enrolled in by a licensee that has not first been approved and certified by the board, if the board has sufficient funding and staff resources to implement the approval and certification process.(3) The continuing professional development services offered by these entities may, but are not required to, utilize pretesting and posttesting or other evaluation techniques to measure and demonstrate improved professional learning and competency.(4) An accredited institution of higher learning, an organization approved as continuing education providers by either the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, and the California Medical Association’s Institute for Medical Quality Continuing Education Program shall be exempt from any application or registration fees that the board may charge for continuing education providers.(5) Unless a course offered by entities listed in paragraph (4) meets the requirements established by the board, the course may not be credited towards the continuing professional development requirements for license renewal.(6) The licensee shall be responsible for obtaining the required course completion documents for courses offered by entities specified in paragraph (1).(f) The board, by regulation, shall fund the administration of this section through professional development services provider and licensing fees to be deposited in the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund. The fees related to the administration of this section shall be sufficient to meet, but shall not exceed, the costs of administering the corresponding provisions of this section.(g) The continuing professional development requirements adopted by the board shall comply with any guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs.SEC. 14. Section 2532.7 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2532.7. (a) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to Section 2532.1, and upon payment of the fee prescribed by Section 2534.2, the board may issue a required professional experience (RPE) temporary license for a period to be determined by the board to an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.(b) Effective July 1, 2003, no person shall obtain the required professional experience for licensure in either an exempt or nonexempt setting, as defined in Section 2530.5, unless they are licensed in accordance with this section or are completing the final clinical externship of a board-approved audiology doctoral training program in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25 in another state.(c) A person who obtains an RPE temporary license outside the State of California shall not be required to hold a temporary license issued pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person is completing the final clinical externship of an audiology doctoral training program in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.(d) Any experience obtained in violation of this act shall not be approved by the board.(e) An RPE temporary license shall terminate upon notice thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested, if it is issued by mistake or if the application for permanent licensure is denied.(f) Upon written application, the board may reissue an RPE temporary license for a period to be determined by the board to an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.SEC. 15. Section 2536 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2536. A speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation is a corporation which is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are speech-language pathologists or audiologists are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs.With respect to a speech-language pathology corporation or an audiology corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.SEC. 16. Section 6501 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:6501. As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Act” means this chapter.(b) “Bureau” means the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau within the Department of Consumer Affairs, established pursuant to Section 6510.(c) “Client” means an individual who is served by a professional fiduciary.(d) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.(e) “Licensee” means a person who is licensed under this chapter as a professional fiduciary.(f) (1) “Professional fiduciary” means either of the following:(A) A person who acts as a guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, for two or more individuals at the same time who are not related to the professional fiduciary or to each other.(B) A personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as defined in Section 58 of the Probate Code, for two or more individuals at the same time who are not related to the professional fiduciary or to each other.(2) “Professional fiduciary” also means a person who acts as a trustee, agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, or agent under a durable power of attorney for finances, for four or more individuals, at the same time.In counting individuals under this paragraph to determine whether a person is a professional fiduciary:(A) Individuals who are related to the fiduciary shall not be counted.(B) All individuals who are related to each other shall be counted as one individual.(C) All trustors who are related to each other shall be counted as one individual, and neither the number of trusts nor the number of beneficiaries of those trusts shall be counted.(D) “Professional fiduciary” also includes a person acting as a professional fiduciary practice administrator, appointed pursuant to Section 2469 or 9765 of the Probate Code.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “related” means related by blood, adoption, marriage, or registered domestic partnership.(4) “Professional fiduciary” does not include any of the following:(A) A trust company, as defined in Section 83 of the Probate Code.(B) An FDIC-insured institution, or its holding companies, subsidiaries, or affiliates. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “affiliate” means an entity that shares an ownership interest with, or that is under the common control of, the FDIC-insured institution.(C) A public agency, including the public guardian, public conservator, or other agency of the State of California or of a county of California or a regional center for persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in Section 4620 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(D) A nonprofit corporation or charitable trust that is described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that satisfies all of the following requirements:(i) Is an organization described in Section 509(a)(1), Section 509(a)(2), or Section 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.(ii) Has been in existence for at least five years.(iii) Has total institutional funds as described in subdivision (e) of Section 18502 of the Probate Code according to its most recent audited financial statement with a value of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000) net of encumbrances.(iv) Is acting as a trustee, incidental to the purposes for which it was organized, of a trust that meets at least one of the following conditions:(I) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to income, a sum certain, or a fixed percentage of the net fair market value of the trust assets as described in Section 664(d) of the Internal Revenue Code governing charitable remainder trusts.(II) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to a guaranteed annuity or a fixed percentage of the fair market value of the property as described in Section 2055(e)(2)(B) or Section 2522(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.(III) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to income, including a pooled income fund from which annual distributions are limited to income as described in Section 642(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code governing pooled income funds.(IV) It is a trust as to which the value of the charitable interest was presently ascertainable upon creation of the trust and deductible for federal gift, estate, or income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect prior to enactment of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1969 (Public Law 91-172).(E) A person employed by, or acting as an agent on behalf of, an entity or agency described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) who is acting within the course and scope of that employment or agency, and a public officer of an agency described in subparagraph (C) acting in the course and scope of official duties.(F) A person whose sole activity as a professional fiduciary is as a broker-dealer, broker-dealer agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative registered and regulated under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code), the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80b-1 et seq.), or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78a et seq.), or involves serving as a trustee to a company regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.).(g) “Committee” means the Professional Fiduciaries Advisory Committee, as established pursuant to Section 6511.SEC. 17. Section 6584 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:6584. A license issued under this chapter may be suspended, revoked, denied, or other disciplinary action may be imposed for one or more of the following causes:(a) Conviction of any felony or any misdemeanor, if the misdemeanor is substantially related to the functions and duties of a professional fiduciary. The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence of the conviction.(b) Failure to notify the bureau of a conviction as required by paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 6561.(c) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining a license.(d) Fraud, dishonesty, corruption, willful violation of duty, gross negligence or incompetence in practice, or unprofessional conduct in, or related to, the practice of a professional fiduciary. For purposes of this section, unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, acts contrary to professional standards concerning any provision of law substantially related to the duties of a professional fiduciary.(e) Failure to comply with, or to pay a monetary sanction imposed by, a court for failure to provide timely reports. The record of the court order, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence that the sanction was imposed.(f) Failure to pay a civil penalty relating to the licensee’s professional fiduciary duties.(g) The revocation of, suspension of, or other disciplinary action against, any other professional license by the State of California or by another state. A certified copy of the revocation, suspension, or disciplinary action is conclusive evidence of that action.(h) Violation of this chapter or of the applicable provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400), Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4600), or Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Probate Code or of any of the statutes, rules, or regulations pertaining to duties or functions of a professional fiduciary.SEC. 18. Section 7076.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7076.5. (a) A contractor may inactivate their license by submitting a form prescribed by the registrar accompanied by the current active license certificate. When the current license certificate has been lost, the licensee shall pay the fee prescribed by law to replace the license certificate. Upon receipt of an acceptable application to inactivate, the registrar shall issue an inactive license certificate to the contractor. The holder of an inactive license shall not be entitled to practice as a contractor until their license is reactivated.(b) Any licensed contractor who is not engaged in work or activities which require a contractor’s license may apply for an inactive license.(c) Inactive licenses shall be valid for a period of four years from their due date.(d) During the period that an existing license is inactive, no bonding requirement pursuant to Section 7071.6, 7071.8, or 7071.9, qualifier requirement pursuant to Section 7068, or workers’ compensation requirements pursuant to Section 7125 shall apply. An applicant for licensure having met the qualifications for issuance may request that the license be issued inactive unless the applicant is subject to the provisions of Section 7071.8.(e) The board shall not refund any of the renewal fee which a licensee may have paid prior to the inactivation of their license.(f) An inactive license shall be renewed on each established renewal date by submitting the renewal application and paying the inactive renewal fee.(g) An inactive license may be reactivated by submitting an application acceptable to the registrar, by paying the full renewal fee for an active license and by fulfilling all other requirements of this chapter. No examination shall be required to reactivate an inactive license.(h) The inactive status of a license shall not bar any disciplinary action by the board against a licensee for any of the causes stated in this chapter.SEC. 19. Section 7137 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7137. (a) The board may set fees by regulation. These fees shall be set according to the following schedule:(1) Application fees shall be set as follows:(A) The application fee for an original license in a single classification shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) and may be increased to not more than five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563).(B) The application fee for each additional classification applied for in connection with an original license shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and may be increased to not more than one hundred eighty-eight dollars ($188).(C) The application fee for each additional classification pursuant to Section 7059 shall be two hundred thirty dollars ($230) and may be increased to not more than two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($288).(D) The application fee to replace a responsible managing officer, responsible managing manager, responsible managing member, or responsible managing employee pursuant to Section 7068.2 shall be two hundred thirty dollars ($230) and may be increased to not more than two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($288).(E) The application fee to add personnel, other than a qualifying individual, to an existing license shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars ($157).(F) The application fee for an asbestos certification shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars ($157).(G) The application fee for a hazardous substance removal or remedial action certification shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) and may be increased to not more than one hundred fifty-seven dollars ($157).(2) The fee to take an examination conducted or administered by a public or private organization pursuant to Section 7065 shall be no greater than the actual cost of the administration of the examination and shall be paid directly to the organization by the applicant.(3) Initial license and registration fees shall be set as follows:(A) The initial license fee for an active or inactive license for an individual owner shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(B) The initial license fee for an active or inactive license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350) and may be increased to not more than four hundred thirty-eight dollars ($438).(C) The registration fee for a home improvement salesperson shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(D) (i) The board shall grant a 50-percent reduction in the fees prescribed by this paragraph to an applicant who is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces, including the National Guard or Reserve components, and was not dishonorably discharged.(ii) To demonstrate discharge grade at the time of the board’s request for the initial license or registration fee, the applicant shall provide the board a copy of a current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by this state or another state with the word “Veteran” printed on its face or a copy of their DD214 long form.(4) License and registration renewal fees shall be set as follows:(A) The renewal fee for an active license for an individual owner shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450) and may be increased to not more than five hundred sixty-three dollars ($563).(B) The renewal fee for an inactive license for an individual owner shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and may be increased to not more than three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).(C) The renewal fee for an active license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be seven hundred dollars ($700) and may be increased to not more than eight hundred seventy-five dollars ($875).(D) The renewal fee for an inactive license for a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture shall be five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to not more than six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625).(E) The renewal fee for a home improvement salesperson registration shall be two hundred dollars ($200) and may be increased to not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(5) The delinquency fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee, if the license is renewed after its expiration.(6) Miscellaneous fees shall be set as follows:(A) In addition to any other fees charged to C-10 contractors, the board shall charge a fee of twenty dollars ($20), to be assessed with the renewal fee for an active license, which shall be used by the board to enforce provisions of the Labor Code related to electrician certification.(B) The board shall require a licensee that is subject to a public complaint requiring a professional or expert investigation or inspection and report pursuant to Section 7019 to pay those reasonable fees that are necessary to cover the costs of that investigation or inspection and report, in accordance with the following provisions:(i) Fees shall be fixed in an amount not more than the board’s cost of contracting for the investigation or inspection and report, except that the minimum fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for each investigation or inspection and report and may be increased to not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each investigation or inspection and report.(ii) The fee shall only be assessed for an investigation or inspection and report that resulted in issuance of a letter of admonishment or a citation pursuant to Sections 7099 and 7099.9 that has become a final order of the registrar.(iii) A license shall not be renewed without payment of the renewal fee and all fees for the investigation or inspection and report pursuant to this subparagraph.(C) The service fee to deposit with the registrar lawful money or cashier’s check pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure for purposes of compliance with any provision of Article 5 (commencing with Section 7065) shall be one hundred dollars ($100), which shall be used by the board only to process each deposit filed with the registrar, to cover the reasonable costs to the registrar for holding money or cashier’s checks in trust in interest bearing deposit or share accounts, and to offset the costs of processing payment of lawful claims against a deposit in a civil action.(D) The fee for the processing and issuance of a duplicate copy of any certificate of licensure or other form evidencing licensure or renewal of licensure pursuant to Section 122 shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).(E) The fee to change the business name of a license as it is recorded under this chapter shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and may be increased to not more than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).(F) The service charge for a dishonored check authorized by Section 6157 of the Government Code shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) for each check.(b) The board shall, by regulation, establish criteria for the approval of expedited processing of applications. Approved expedited processing of applications for licensure or registration, as required by other provisions of law, shall not be subject to this subdivision.SEC. 20. Section 7152 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7152. (a) “Home improvement salesperson” is a person who is registered under this chapter and engaged in the business of soliciting, selling, negotiating, or executing contracts for home improvements, for the sale, installation, or furnishing of home improvement goods or services, or of swimming pools, spas, or hot tubs on behalf of a home improvement contractor licensed under this chapter.(b) A home improvement salesperson shall register with the board in order to engage in the business of, or act in the capacity of, a home improvement salesperson.(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 7154, a home improvement salesperson may be employed by one, or more than one, home improvement contractor. However, prior to engaging in any activity described in subdivision (a) of this section, a home improvement salesperson shall identify to the owner or tenant the business name and license number of the contractor they are representing for the purposes of that transaction. Failure to do so is a cause of disciplinary action within the meaning of Section 7155.(d) The following shall not be required to be registered as home improvement salespersons:(1) An officer of record of a corporation licensed pursuant to this chapter, or a manager, member, or officer of record of a limited liability company licensed pursuant to this chapter.(2) A general partner listed on the license record of a partnership licensed pursuant to this chapter.(3) A qualifying person, as defined in Section 7025.(4) A salesperson whose sales are all made pursuant to negotiations between the parties if the negotiations are initiated by the prospective buyer at or with a general merchandise retail establishment that operates from a fixed location where goods or services are offered for sale.(5) A person who contacts the prospective buyer for the exclusive purpose of scheduling appointments for a registered home improvement salesperson.(6) A bona fide service repairperson who is in the employ of a licensed contractor and whose repair or service call is limited to the service, repair, or emergency repair initially requested by the buyer of the service.(e) The exemption to registration provided under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (d) shall apply only to those individuals who, at the time of the sales transaction, are listed as personnel of record for the licensee responsible for soliciting, negotiating, or contracting for a service or improvement that is subject to regulation under this article.SEC. 21. Section 7524 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7524. (a) Every agreement to provide a service regulated by this chapter, including, but not limited to, contract agreements and investigative agreements, shall be in writing. An initial client service agreement shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:(1) The licensed private investigator’s name, business address, business telephone number, and license number.(2) A disclosure that private investigators are licensed and regulated by the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services within the Department of Consumer Affairs.(3) Approximate start and completion dates of the work to be provided.(4) A description of the scope of the investigation or services to be provided. An agreement shall indicate whether or not a written report is to be provided to the client and the agreed upon method of delivery of that written report, as applicable.(5) All labor, services, and materials to be provided for the scope of work conducted by the private investigator.(6) An explanation of the fees agreed upon by the parties, including a breakdown of how the fees are assessed by the licensee.(7) Any other matters agreed upon by the parties.(b) Any amendment, addendum, or other modification to an initial client service agreement shall be in writing and is subject to the requirements of this section. An amendment, addendum, or other modification shall include a description of the changes to the scope of work, start and completion dates, method of delivery, fees to be charged, and other matters agreed upon in the initial client service agreement, as applicable.(c) (1) The initial client service agreement and any amendment, addendum, or other modification to the agreement shall be legible and clearly indicate any other document incorporated into it.(2) Before any work commences, the client shall receive a signed copy of the written initial client service agreement and any amendment, addendum, or other modification to the agreement that was agreed to before commencement of the work.(3) Services detailed under the scope of work shall not be performed and charges shall not accrue before written authorization to proceed is obtained from the client.(d) Upon completion of the investigation, any written report, as agreed upon by all parties and indicated in the agreement, shall be provided to the client within 30 days from the completion date and in accordance with the agreed upon delivery method.(e) The licensee shall maintain a legible copy of the signed agreement and investigative findings, including any written report, for a minimum of two years. These records shall be made available for inspection by the bureau upon demand. Making these records available for inspection by the bureau shall not violate, waive, or extinguish the lawyer-client privilege under Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the attorney work product doctrine as restated in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 2018.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the duty to maintain the confidence and preserve the secrets of an attorney’s client under subdivision (e) of Section 6068, or the protections of any other rule or law related to attorney work product or the attorney-client privilege.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.SEC. 22. Section 8027 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:8027. (a) As used in this section, “school” means a court reporter training program or an institution that provides a course of instruction approved by the board and the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, is a public school in this state, or is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges.(b) A court reporting school shall be primarily organized to train students for the practice of shorthand reporting, as defined in Sections 8016 and 8017. Its educational program shall be on the postsecondary or collegiate level. It shall be legally organized and authorized to conduct its program under all applicable laws of the state, and shall conform to and offer all components of the minimum prescribed course of study established by the board. Its records shall be kept and shall be maintained in a manner to render them safe from theft, fire, or other loss. The records shall indicate positive daily and clock-hour attendance of each student for all classes, apprenticeship and graduation reports, high school transcripts or the equivalent or self-certification of high school graduation or the equivalent, transcripts of other education, and student progress to date, including all progress and counseling reports.(c) Any school intending to offer a program in court reporting shall notify the board within 30 days of the date on which it provides notice to, or seeks approval from, the State Department of Education, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, whichever is applicable. The board shall review the proposed curriculum and provide the school tentative approval, or notice of denial, within 60 days of receipt of the notice. The school shall apply for provisional recognition pursuant to subdivision (d) within no more than one year from the date it begins offering court reporting classes.(d) The board may grant provisional recognition to a new court reporting school upon satisfactory evidence that it has met all of the provisions of subdivision (b) and this subdivision. Recognition may be granted by the board to a provisionally recognized school after it has been in continuous operation for a period of no less than three consecutive years from the date provisional recognition was granted, during which period the school shall provide satisfactory evidence that at least one person has successfully completed the entire course of study established by the board and complied with the provisions of Section 8020, and has been issued a certificate to practice shorthand reporting as defined in Sections 8016 and 8017. The board may, for good cause shown, extend the three-year provisional recognition period for not more than one year. Failure to meet the provisions and terms of this section shall require the board to deny recognition. Once granted, recognition may be withdrawn by the board for failure to comply with all applicable laws and regulations.(e) Application for recognition of a court reporting school shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by all evidence, statements, or documents requested. Each branch, extension center, or off-campus facility requires separate application.(f) All recognized and provisionally recognized court reporting schools shall notify the board of any change in school name, address, telephone number, responsible court reporting program manager, owner of private schools, and the effective date thereof, within 30 days of the change. All of these notifications shall be made in writing.(g) A school shall notify the board in writing immediately of the discontinuance or pending discontinuance of its court reporting program or any of the program’s components. Within two years of the date this notice is sent to the board, the school shall discontinue its court reporting program in its entirety. The board may, for good cause shown, grant not more than two one-year extensions of this period to a school. If a student is to be enrolled after this notice is sent to the board, a school shall disclose to the student the fact of the discontinuance or pending discontinuance of its court reporting program or any of its program components.(h) The board shall maintain a roster of currently recognized and provisionally recognized court reporting schools, including, but not limited to, the name, address, telephone number, and the name of the responsible court reporting program manager of each school.(i) The board shall maintain statistics that display the number and passing percentage of all first-time examinees, including, but not limited to, those qualified by each recognized or provisionally recognized school and those first-time examinees qualified by other methods as defined in Section 8020.(j) Inspections and investigations shall be conducted by the board as necessary to carry out this section, including, but not limited to, unannounced site visits.(k) All recognized and provisionally recognized schools shall print in their school or course catalog the name, address, and telephone number of the board. At a minimum, the information shall be in 8-point bold type and include the following statement: “IN ORDER FOR A PERSON TO QUALIFY FROM A SCHOOL TO TAKE THE STATE LICENSING EXAMINATION, THE PERSON SHALL COMPLETE A PROGRAM AT A RECOGNIZED SCHOOL. FOR INFORMATION CONCERNING THE MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS THAT A COURT REPORTING PROGRAM MUST MEET IN ORDER TO BE RECOGNIZED, CONTACT: THE COURT REPORTERS BOARD OF CALIFORNIA; (ADDRESS); (TELEPHONE NUMBER).” (l) Each court reporting school shall file with the board, not later than June 30 of each year, a current school catalog that shows all course offerings and staff, and for private schools, the owner, except that where there have been no changes to the catalog within the previous year, no catalog need be sent. In addition, each school shall also file with the board a statement certifying whether the school is in compliance with all statutes and the rules and regulations of the board, signed by the responsible court reporting program manager.(m) A school offering court reporting shall not make any written or verbal claims of employment opportunities or potential earnings unless those claims are based on verified data and reflect current employment conditions.(n) If a school offers a course of instruction that exceeds the board’s minimum requirements, the school shall disclose orally and in writing the board’s minimum requirements and how the course of instruction differs from those criteria. The school shall make this disclosure before a prospective student executes an agreement obligating that person to pay any money to the school for the course of instruction. The school shall also make this disclosure to all students enrolled on January 1, 2002.(o) Private and public schools shall provide each prospective student with all of the following and have the prospective student sign a document that shall become part of that individual’s permanent record, acknowledging receipt of each item:(1) A student consumer information brochure published by the board.(2) A list of the school’s graduation requirements, including the number of tests, the pass point of each test, the speed of each test, and the type of test, such as jury charge or literary.(3) A list of requirements to qualify for the state-certified shorthand reporter licensing examination, including the number of tests, the pass point of each test, the speed of each test, and the type of test, such as jury charge or literary, if different than those requirements listed in paragraph (2).(4) A copy of the school’s board-approved benchmarks for satisfactory progress as identified in subdivision (u).(5) A report showing the number of students from the school who qualified for each of the certified shorthand reporter licensing examinations within the preceding two years, the number of those students that passed each examination, the time, as of the date of qualification, that each student was enrolled in court reporting school, and the placement rate for all students that passed each examination.(6) On and after January 1, 2005, the school shall also provide to prospective students the number of hours each currently enrolled student who has qualified to take the next licensing test, exclusive of transfer students, has attended court reporting classes.(p) All enrolled students shall have the information in subdivisions (n) and (o) on file no later than June 30, 2005.(q) Public schools shall provide the information in subdivisions (n) and (o) to each new student the first day they attend theory or machine speed class, if it was not provided previously.(r) Each enrolled student shall be provided written notification of any change in qualification or graduation requirements that is being implemented due to the requirements of any one of the school’s oversight agencies. This notice shall be provided to each affected student at least 30 days before the effective date of the change and shall state the new requirement and the name, address, and telephone number of the agency that is requiring it of the school. Each student shall initial and date a document acknowledging receipt of that information and that document, or a copy thereof, shall be made part of the student’s permanent file.(s) Schools shall make available a comprehensive final examination in each academic subject to any student desiring to challenge an academic class in order to obtain credit towards certification for the state licensing examination. The points required to pass a challenge examination shall not be higher than the minimum points required of other students completing the academic class.(t) An individual serving as a teacher, instructor, or reader shall meet the qualifications specified by regulation for their position.(u) Each school shall provide a substitute teacher or instructor for any class for which the teacher or instructor is absent for two consecutive days or more.(v) The board has the authority to approve or disapprove benchmarks for satisfactory progress which each school shall develop for its court reporting program. Schools shall use only board-approved benchmarks to comply with the provisions of paragraph (4) of subdivision (o) and subdivision (u).(w) Each school shall counsel each student a minimum of one time within each 12-month period to identify the level of attendance and progress, and the prognosis for completing the requirements to become eligible to sit for the state licensing examination. If the student has not progressed in accordance with the board-approved benchmarks for that school, the student shall be counseled a minimum of one additional time within that same 12-month period.(x) The school shall provide to the board, for each student qualifying through the school as eligible to sit for the state licensing examination, the number of hours the student attended court reporting classes, both academic and machine speed classes, including theory.(y) The pass rate of first-time examination takers for each school offering court reporting shall meet or exceed the average pass rate of all first-time test takers for a majority of examinations given for the preceding three years. Failure to do so shall require the board to conduct a review of the program. In addition, the board may place the school on probation and may withdraw recognition if the school continues to place below the above-described standard on the two examinations that follow the three-year period.(z) A school shall not require more than one 10-minute qualifying examination, as defined in the regulations of the board, for a student to be eligible to sit for the state certification examination.(aa) A school shall provide the board the actual number of hours of attendance for each applicant the school qualifies for the state licensing examination.(ab) The board shall, by December 1, 2001, do the following by regulation as necessary:(1) Establish the format that shall be used by schools to report tracking of all attendance hours and actual timeframes for completed coursework.(2) Require schools to provide a minimum of 10 hours of live dictation class each school week for every full-time student.(3) Require schools to provide students with the opportunity to read back from their stenographic notes a minimum of one time each day to their instructor.(4) Require schools to provide students with the opportunity to practice with a school-approved speed-building audio recording, or other assigned material, a minimum of one hour per day after school hours as a homework assignment and provide the notes from this audio recording to their instructor the following day for review.(5) Develop standardization of policies on the use and administration of qualifier examinations by schools.(6) Define qualifier examination as follows: the qualifier examination shall consist of 4-voice testimony of 10-minute duration at 200 words per minute, graded at 95 percent accuracy, and in accordance with the guidelines followed by the board. Schools shall be required to date and number each qualifier and announce the date and number to the students at the time of administering the qualifier. All qualifiers shall indicate the actual dictation time of the test and the school shall catalog and maintain the qualifier for a period of not less than three years for the purpose of inspection by the board.(7) Require schools to develop a program to provide students with the opportunity to interact with professional court reporters to provide skill support, mentoring, or counseling that they can document at least quarterly.(8) Define qualifications and educational requirements required of instructors and readers that read test material and qualifiers.(ac) The board shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this section not later than September 1, 2002.(ad) The board may recover costs for any additional expenses incurred under the enactment amending this section in the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature pursuant to its fee authority in Section 8031.SEC. 23. Section 8764.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:8764.5. Statements shall appear on the map as follows:Surveyor’s StatementThis map correctly represents a survey made by me or under my direction in conformance with the requirements of the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act at the request of Name of Person Authorizing Surveyin _______, 20__.(Signed and sealed) (Date) L.S. (or R.C.E.) No. County Surveyor’s StatementThis map has been examined in accordance with Section 8766 of the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act this ____ day of ____, 20__.(Signed and sealed) _____ County Surveyor _____ L.S. (or R.C.E.) No. Recorder’s StatementFiled this ____ day of ____, 20__, at ____.m. in Book ____ of ____ at page ____, at the request of ____.(Signed) _____ County Recorder _____ No other statements may appear on the face of the map except those required or authorized by this article.SEC. 24. Section 9889.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9889.1. Any license issued pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) may be suspended or revoked by the director. The director may refuse to issue a license to any applicant for the reasons set forth in Section 9889.2. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.SEC. 25. Section 9889.2 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9889.2. The director may deny a license if the applicant or any partner, officer, or director thereof:(a) Fails to meet the qualifications established by the bureau pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) for the issuance of the license applied for.(b) Was previously the holder of a license issued under this chapter which license has been revoked and never reissued or which license was suspended and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled.(c) Has committed any act which, if committed by any licensee, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this chapter.(d) Has committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit whereby another is injured or whereby the applicant has benefited.(e) Has acted in the capacity of a licensed person or firm under this chapter without having a license therefor.(f) Has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, or been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of the license holder in question, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of an order granting probation following such conviction, suspending the imposition of sentence, or of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the plea or verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.SEC. 26. Section 9889.9 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9889.9. When any license has been revoked or suspended following a hearing under the provisions of this article, any additional license issued under Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) in the name of the licensee may be likewise revoked or suspended by the director.SEC. 27. Section 12107 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:12107. The secretary shall establish tolerances and specifications and other technical requirements for commercial weighing and measuring. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest standards as recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 44 “Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for Weighing and Measuring Devices,” except as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation adopted by the secretary.The secretary may, by regulation, establish tolerances and specifications for commercial weighing and measuring devices not included in Handbook 44.Any regulation shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in conformity with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.It shall be unlawful for any person to violate any of the rules, regulations, tolerances, specifications, or standards established under this section.SEC. 28. Section 12211 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:12211. Each sealer shall, from time to time, weigh or measure packages, containers, or amounts of commodities sold, or in the process of delivery, in order to determine whether they contain the quantity or amount represented and whether they are being sold in accordance with law.The secretary shall adopt necessary regulations governing the procedures to be followed by sealers in connection with the weighing or measuring of amounts of commodities in individual packages, containers, or lots of packages or containers, including the procedures for sampling a lot, and for determining whether any package, container, or a lot of packages or containers complies with this section.In adopting those regulations, the secretary shall adopt by reference the package checking procedures recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the current edition of the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 133, “Checking the Net Contents of Packaged Goods,” and any subsequent amendments thereto, except insofar as those requirements are specifically modified, amended, or rejected by a regulation adopted by the secretary.Any lot, package, or container of any commodity that conforms to this section shall be deemed to be in conformity with this division relating to stated net weights or measures.Whenever a lot, package, or container of any commodity is found to contain, through the procedures authorized in this section, a less amount than that represented, the sealer shall order, in writing, that lot, package, or container of commodity off sale and require that an accurate statement of quantity be placed on each package or container before it may be released for sale by the sealer in writing. The sealer may seize as evidence any package or container that is found to contain a less amount than that represented.SEC. 29. Section 12500.8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:12500.8. The secretary may enter into an agreement with the National Type Evaluation Program, a certification program of the National Council on Weights and Measures, and other weights and measures jurisdictions, to accept the certifications of each other for prototype examination purposes.SEC. 30. Section 12609 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:12609. The secretary shall adopt necessary regulations to carry out the purpose of this division and for the testing of packages to verify the net quantity statements. In adopting these regulations, the secretary shall adopt by reference the packaging and labeling requirements recommended by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the current edition of the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130, Uniform Packaging and Labeling Regulations, except insofar as those requirements are specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation by the secretary. The regulations shall include exemptions from full compliance with this chapter for good and sufficient reasons. Any exemptions affecting consumer commodities shall be in conformance with exemptions permitted by federal regulations. Any regulation, or amendment thereof, shall be adopted by the secretary in conformity with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 31. Section 13404.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:13404.5. The secretary shall establish the method of sale of motor vehicle fuels and lubricants sold at retail to the public. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest method of sale for motor vehicle fuels and lubricants adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 “Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality,” except as specifically provided by the Legislature or modified, amended, or rejected by regulations adopted by the secretary. In the absence of national standards, the secretary may adopt interim standards of method of sale until the time when the standards are adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.SEC. 32. Section 13711 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:13711. (a) An engine coolant or antifreeze is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, principal ingredient, intended application of the coolant or antifreeze, name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or distributor, and an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.(2) The container does not bear a chart on the label showing appropriate amounts of engine coolant or antifreeze and water in terms of liquid measure to be used to provide protection from freezing at temperatures to at least 30 degrees below zero Fahrenheit.(3) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the boiling point of a 50 percent by volume mixture of engine coolant or antifreeze and water in degrees Fahrenheit.(4) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “engine coolant” or “antifreeze” in letters at least 1/8 inch high on the principal display panel. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “engine coolant” or “antifreeze” in letters at least 1/4 inch high on the principal display panel.(5) The principal ingredient is propylene glycol or glycerin and the container does not bear a statement on the label not to use an ethylene glycol hydrometer concentration tester for propylene glycol or glycerin coolants.(6) The container and carton do not bear a lot or batch number on the label identifying the container lot and date of packaging.(b) A prediluted engine coolant or prediluted antifreeze is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, principal ingredient, intended application of the coolant or antifreeze, name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or distributor, and an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.(2) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the protection from freezing in degrees Fahrenheit.(3) The container does not bear a statement on the label showing the boiling point in degrees Fahrenheit.(4) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “prediluted engine coolant” or “prediluted antifreeze” in letters at least 1/8 inch high on the principal display panel. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “prediluted engine coolant” or “prediluted antifreeze” in letters at least 1/4 inch high on the principal display panel.(5) The container is one quart or less and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “DO NOT ADD WATER” in letters at least1/8 inch high. The container is greater than one quart and does not bear a label on which is printed the words “DO NOT ADD WATER” in letters at least 1/4 inch high.(6) The principal ingredient is propylene glycol or glycerin and the container does not bear a statement on the label not to use an ethylene glycol hydrometer concentration tester for propylene glycol or glycerin coolants.(7) The container and carton do not bear a lot or batch number on the label identifying the container lot and date of packaging.(c) “Transmission fluid” is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:(1) The container does not bear a label on which is printed the brand name, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, seller, or distributor, the words “Transmission Fluid,” and the duty type classification.(2) The container does not bear a label on which is printed an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.(3) The labeling on the container is false or misleading.(4) The container and carton do not bear information that identifies the container lot or batch.(d) Brake fluid is mislabeled if any of the following occurs:(1) The container does not bear a label that conforms to the requirements of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, United States Department of Transportation, and upon which is printed the brand name.(2) The container does not bear an accurate statement on the label of the quantity of the contents in terms of liquid measure.(3) The labeling on the container is false or misleading.(e) The secretary shall establish the method of sale of diesel exhaust fluid sold at retail to the public. In doing so, the secretary shall adopt, by reference, the latest method of sale for diesel exhaust fluid adopted by the National Council on Weights and Measures and published in the National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook 130 “Uniform Laws and Regulations in the Areas of Legal Metrology and Fuel Quality,” except as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by regulation adopted by the secretary.(f) If a container or lot of containers of any commodity subject to this chapter is found to contain a commodity not in conformity with this chapter, the sealer may take one or more samples reasonably necessary for enforcement purposes and may, in writing, order the containers off sale. Any lot or container ordered off sale pursuant to this section shall be subject to a disposal order by the enforcing officer and shall not be sold, offered for sale, or transported, except in accordance with that disposal order. Any action pursuant to this section shall not affect any rights of a retailer under a warranty of merchantability or warranty of fitness.SEC. 33. Section 19094 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:19094. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Component” means the separate constituent parts of upholstered furniture sold in California, as identified in Technical Bulletin 117-2013, specifically cover fabrics, barrier materials, resilient filling materials, and decking materials.(2) “Covered products” means any flexible polyurethane foam or upholstered or reupholstered furniture sold in California that is required to meet the test requirements set forth in Technical Bulletin 117-2013, entitled “Requirements, Test Procedure and Apparatus for Testing the Smolder Resistance of Materials Used in Upholstered Furniture.”(3) “Flame-retardant chemical” means any chemical or chemical compound for which a functional use is to resist or inhibit the spread of fire. Flame-retardant chemicals include, but are not limited to, halogenated, phosphorous-based, nitrogen-based, and nanoscale flame retardants, flame-retardant chemicals listed as “designated chemicals” pursuant to Section 105440 of the Health and Safety Code, and any chemical or chemical compound for which “flame retardant” appears on the substance Safety Data Sheet (SDS) pursuant to Section 1910.1200(g) of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(4) “Chemical” means either of the following:(A) An organic or inorganic substance of a particular molecular identity, including any combination of those substances occurring, in whole or in part, as a result of a chemical reaction or occurring in nature, and any element, ion, or uncombined radical, and any degradate, metabolite, or reaction product of a substance with a particular molecular identity.(B) A chemical ingredient, which means a substance comprising one or more substances described in subparagraph (A).(5) “Molecular identity” means the substance’s properties listed below:(A) Agglomeration state.(B) Bulk density.(C) Chemical composition, including surface coating.(D) Crystal structure.(E) Dispersibility.(F) Molecular structure.(G) Particle density.(H) Particle size, size distribution, and surface area.(I) Physical form and shape, at room temperature and pressure.(J) Physicochemical properties.(K) Porosity.(L) Solubility in water and biologically relevant fluids.(M) Surface charge.(N) Surface reactivity.(6) “Added flame-retardant chemicals” means flame-retardant chemicals that are present in any covered product or component thereof at levels above 1,000 parts per million.(7) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.(8) “Consumer Price Index” means the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics.(b) (1) A manufacturer of covered products shall indicate whether or not the product contains added flame-retardant chemicals by including the following “flame-retardant chemical statement” on the label described in Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations for covered products:“The upholstery materials in this product:_____contain added flame-retardant chemicals_____contain NO added flame-retardant chemicalsThe State of California has updated the flammability standard and determined that the fire safety requirements for this product can be met without adding flame-retardant chemicals. The state has identified many flame-retardant chemicals as being known to, or strongly suspected of, adversely impacting human health or development.”A manufacturer of covered products shall indicate the absence or presence of added flame-retardant chemicals by placing an “X” in one of the appropriate blanks.(2) This statement shall be included in the label described in Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations in accordance with the bureau’s regulations for that label. The statement need not be in all capital letters, and shall follow the statement required by Section 1374.3 of Title 4 of the California Code of Regulations.(c) (1) The bureau shall ensure compliance with the labeling requirements in this section.(2) (A) The bureau shall provide the Department of Toxic Substances Control with a selection of samples from covered products marked “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” for testing for the presence of added flame-retardant chemicals. The samples shall be from the components identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). The bureau shall select samples based on consultation with the department, taking into account a range of manufacturers and types of covered products. The bureau and the department shall consult on the tests to be conducted by the department. The department shall provide the results of any completed test to the bureau. The bureau shall reimburse the department for the cost of testing for the presence of added flame-retardant chemicals in covered products marked “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals.”(B) No later than August 1 of each fiscal year, the bureau shall assess available resources and determine the number of tests to be conducted in the corresponding fiscal year, pursuant to this subparagraph.(3) (A) If the department’s testing shows that a covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, the bureau may assess fines for violations against manufacturers of the covered product and component manufacturers to be held jointly and severally liable for the violation.(B) A fine for a violation of this subparagraph relating to mislabeling shall be assessed in accordance with the factors described in subdivision (d) and the following schedule:(i) The fine for the first violation shall be not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).(ii) The fine for the second violation shall be not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).(iii) The fine for the third violation shall be not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) but not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).(iv) The fine for any subsequent violation shall be not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).(C) The fines in paragraph (B) shall replace any other fines in this article for a violation of the testing requirements of this section. This clause does not alter or amend any other penalty otherwise imposed by this article.(D) If the department’s testing shows that a covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, in addition to a fine or any other request, the bureau may request that the label required by subdivision (b) for covered products that belong to the same stock keeping unit (SKU) currently produced by the manufacturer be corrected to reflect that flame-retardant chemicals are added to the covered product.(E) If the department’s testing shows that a covered product labeled as “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” is mislabeled because it contains added flame-retardant chemicals, in addition to a fine or any other request, the bureau may request additional testing of more products belonging to the same stock keeping unit (SKU) at the manufacturer’s expense to verify the accuracy of the label required by subdivision (b) for covered products if the manufacturer wishes to retain the “contain NO added flame-retardant chemicals” designation on the label required by subdivision (b).(d) (1) The bureau shall make information about any citation issued pursuant to this section available to the public on its internet website.(2) In determining the amount of the fine for violations of this section, the bureau shall consider the following factors:(A) The nature and severity of the violation.(B) The good or bad faith of the cited person.(C) The history of previous violations.(D) Evidence that the violation was willful.(E) The extent to which the cited person or entity has cooperated with the bureau.(3) (A) The bureau shall adjust all minimum and maximum fines imposed by this section for inflation every five years.(B) The adjustment shall be equivalent to the percentage, if any, that the Consumer Price Index at the time of adjustment exceeds the Consumer Price Index at the time this section goes into effect. Any increase determined under this paragraph shall be rounded as follows:(i) In multiples of ten dollars ($10) in the case of penalties less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100).(ii) In multiples of one hundred dollars ($100) in the case of penalties greater than one hundred dollars ($100) but less than or equal to one thousand dollars ($1,000).(iii) In multiples of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the case of penalties greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(4) It shall be the duty of the bureau to receive complaints from consumers concerning covered products sold in California.(e) The bureau may adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to carry out this section.SEC. 34. Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26051.5. (a) An applicant for a state license issued pursuant to this division to conduct commercial cannabis activity, as defined in Section 26001, shall do all of the following:(1) Except as provided in subparagraph (G), require that each owner, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state and federal arrests, and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.(A) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may obtain criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for an applicant or its owners, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, for any state license, as described in Section 26050, under this division pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the licensing authority.(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the licensing authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(D) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for applicants.(E) The Department of Justice shall charge the applicant a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the requests described in this paragraph.(F) Notwithstanding any other law, a licensing authority may request and receive from a local or state agency certified records of all arrests and convictions, certified records regarding probation, and any and all other related documentation needed to complete an applicant or licensee investigation. A local or state agency may provide those records to a licensing authority upon request.(G) If an owner has previously submitted fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a valid state license issued by a licensing authority, all of the following apply:(i) The owner shall not be required to submit additional fingerprint images and related information pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a subsequent application for a state license.(ii) The department shall not consider the owner’s criminal history information obtained from the fingerprint images and related information that were previously submitted pursuant to this paragraph when considering whether to issue a subsequent state license.(iii) An owner shall not be required to resubmit owner-related information previously provided to the department.(2) Provide evidence of the legal right to occupy and use the proposed location and provide a statement from the landowner of real property or that landowner’s agent where the commercial cannabis activity will occur, as proof to demonstrate the landowner has acknowledged and consented to permit commercial cannabis activities to be conducted on the property by the tenant applicant.(3) Provide evidence that the proposed location is in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 26054.(4) Provide a statement, signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury, that the information provided is complete, true, and accurate.(5) (A) (i) For an applicant with 20 or more employees, or an applicant with 10 or more employees that submits an application on or after July 1, 2024, provide a notarized statement that the applicant will enter into, or demonstrate that it has already entered into, and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement. On and after July 1, 2024, the department shall not renew a license for a licensee with 10 or more employees unless the licensee provides a statement that the licensee has already entered into and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement.(ii) For an applicant with 10 or more employees but less than 20 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 20th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is earlier.(iii) For an applicant with less than 10 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 10th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is later.(iv) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to revoke or suspend a license for a violation of this paragraph.(B) Compliance with the terms of an applicable labor peace agreement is a condition of licensure. A licensee seeking renewal of any license shall attest to the department that it remains in compliance with the terms of any applicable labor peace agreement.(C) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may report to the department that a licensee has failed to provide a truthful attestation of compliance with subparagraph (B).(i) The reporting party shall provide documentation, in a form and manner required by the department, to substantiate their allegation before the department considers it. The department shall collaborate with such agencies as it deems relevant to evaluate the report.(ii) If the department substantiates the validity of a report made pursuant to this subparagraph, the department may suspend, revoke, place on probation with terms and conditions, or otherwise discipline the license and fine the licensee.(D) (i) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may file a complaint with the Agricultural Labor Relations Board that an organization with which a licensee has entered into a labor peace agreement is not a bona fide labor organization.(ii) The Agricultural Labor Relations Board shall consider all relevant evidence provided or obtained in rendering a decision on whether the entity is a bona fide labor organization and issue a report with its findings no later than 90 days from receiving the complaint.(iii) If the Agricultural Labor Relations Board determines that the entity is not a bona fide labor organization, the labor peace agreement shall be null and void. The department shall promptly notify all licensees that have signed labor peace agreements with the entity that the entity was found not to be a bona fide labor organization and offer those licensees a reasonable time period, not to exceed 180 days, to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization. Failure to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization after that reasonable time period shall be a violation of this section.(E) For the purposes of this paragraph, all of the following shall apply:(i) “Employee” does not include a supervisor.(ii) “Labor organization” means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and which exists, in whole or in part, for the purpose of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work for employees.(iii) “Supervisor” means an individual having authority, in the interest of the applicant, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or responsibility to direct them or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if, in connection with the foregoing, the exercise of that authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.(6) Provide the applicant’s valid seller’s permit number issued pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or indicate that the applicant is currently applying for a seller’s permit.(7) Provide any other information required by the department.(8) For an applicant seeking a cultivation license, provide a statement declaring the applicant is an “agricultural employer,” as defined in the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code), to the extent not prohibited by law.(9) Pay all applicable fees required for licensure by the department.(10) Provide proof of a bond to cover the costs of destruction of cannabis or cannabis products if necessitated by a violation of licensing requirements.(11) (A) Provide a statement, upon initial application and application for renewal, that the applicant employs, or will employ within one year of receiving or renewing a license, one supervisor and one employee who have successfully completed a Division of Occupational Safety and Health 30-hour general industry outreach course offered by a training provider that is authorized by an OSHA Training Institute Education Center to provide the course. This paragraph shall not be construed to alter or amend existing requirements for employers to provide occupational safety and health training to employees.(B) An applicant with only one employee shall not be subject to subparagraph (A).(C) For purposes of this paragraph “employee” has the same meaning as provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5) and “supervisor” has the same meaning as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5).(b) An applicant shall also include in the application a detailed description of the applicant’s operating procedures for all of the following, as required by the department:(1) Cultivation.(2) Extraction and infusion methods.(3) The transportation process.(4) Inventory procedures.(5) Quality control procedures.(6) Security protocols.(7) For applicants seeking licensure to cultivate, the source or sources of water the applicant will use for cultivation, as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 26060.1. For purposes of this paragraph, “cultivation” as used in Section 26060.1 shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 26001. The department shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife in the implementation of this paragraph.(c) The applicant shall also provide a complete detailed diagram of the proposed premises wherein the license privileges will be exercised, with sufficient particularity to enable ready determination of the bounds of the premises, showing all boundaries, dimensions, entrances and exits, interior partitions, walls, rooms, and common or shared entryways, and include a brief statement or description of the principal activity to be conducted therein, and, for licenses permitting cultivation, measurements of the planned canopy, including aggregate square footage and individual square footage of separate cultivation areas, if any, roads, water crossings, points of diversion, water storage, and all other facilities and infrastructure related to the cultivation.(d) Provide a complete list of every person with a financial interest in the person applying for the license as required by the department. For purposes of this subdivision, “persons with a financial interest” does not include persons whose only interest in a licensee is an interest in a diversified mutual fund, blind trust, or similar instrument.SEC. 34.5 Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26051.5. (a) An applicant for a state license issued pursuant to this division to conduct commercial cannabis activity, as defined in Section 26001, shall do all of the following:(1) Except as provided in subparagraph (G), require that each owner, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state and federal arrests, and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.(A) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may obtain criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for an applicant or its owners, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (aq) of Section 26001, for any state license, as described in Section 26050, under this division pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(B) When received, the Department of Justice shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history records check. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the licensing authority.(C) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the licensing authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.(D) The department shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for applicants.(E) The Department of Justice shall charge the applicant a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the requests described in this paragraph.(F) Notwithstanding any other law, a licensing authority may request and receive from a local or state agency certified records of all arrests and convictions, certified records regarding probation, and any and all other related documentation needed to complete an applicant or licensee investigation. A local or state agency may provide those records to a licensing authority upon request.(G) If an owner has previously submitted fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a valid state license issued by a licensing authority, all of the following apply:(i) The owner shall not be required to submit additional fingerprint images and related information pursuant to this paragraph in connection with a subsequent application for a state license.(ii) The department shall not consider the owner’s criminal history information obtained from the fingerprint images and related information that were previously submitted pursuant to this paragraph when considering whether to issue a subsequent state license.(iii) An owner shall not be required to resubmit owner-related information previously provided to the department.(2) Provide evidence of the legal right to occupy and use the proposed location and provide a statement from the landowner of real property or that landowner’s agent where the commercial cannabis activity will occur, as proof to demonstrate the landowner has acknowledged and consented to permit commercial cannabis activities to be conducted on the property by the tenant applicant.(3) Provide evidence that the proposed location is in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 26054.(4) Provide a statement, signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury, that the information provided is complete, true, and accurate.(5) (A) (i) For an applicant with 20 or more employees, or an applicant with 10 or more employees that submits an application on or after July 1, 2024, provide a notarized statement that the applicant will enter into, or demonstrate that it has already entered into, and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement. On and after July 1, 2024, the department shall not renew a license for a licensee with 10 or more employees unless the licensee provides a statement that the licensee has already entered into and will abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement.(ii) For an applicant with 10 or more employees but less than 20 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 20th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is earlier.(iii) For an applicant with less than 10 employees that has not yet entered into a labor peace agreement, provide a notarized statement as a part of its application indicating that the applicant will enter into and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement within 60 days of employing its 10th employee, or on or before July 1, 2024, whichever is later.(iv) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the authority of the department to revoke or suspend a license for a violation of this paragraph.(B) Compliance with the terms of an applicable labor peace agreement is a condition of licensure. A licensee seeking renewal of any license shall attest to the department that it remains in compliance with the terms of any applicable labor peace agreement.(C) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may report to the department that a licensee has failed to provide a truthful attestation of compliance with subparagraph (B).(i) The reporting party shall provide documentation, in a form and manner required by the department, to substantiate their allegation before the department considers it. The department shall collaborate with such agencies as it deems relevant to evaluate the report.(ii) If the department substantiates the validity of a report made pursuant to this subparagraph, the department may suspend, revoke, place on probation with terms and conditions, or otherwise discipline the license and fine the licensee.(D) (i) Any labor organization, or any current or former employee of the relevant licensee, may file a complaint with the Agricultural Labor Relations Board that an organization with which a licensee has entered into a labor peace agreement is not a bona fide labor organization.(ii) The Agricultural Labor Relations Board shall consider all relevant evidence provided or obtained in rendering a decision on whether the entity is a bona fide labor organization and issue a report with its findings no later than 90 days from receiving the complaint.(iii) If the Agricultural Labor Relations Board determines that the entity is not a bona fide labor organization, the labor peace agreement shall be null and void. The department shall promptly notify all licensees that have signed labor peace agreements with the entity that the entity was found not to be a bona fide labor organization and offer those licensees a reasonable time period, not to exceed 180 days, to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization. Failure to enter into a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization after that reasonable time period shall be a violation of this section.(E) For the purposes of this paragraph, all of the following shall apply:(i) “Employee” does not include a supervisor.(ii) “Labor organization” means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and which exists, in whole or in part, for the purpose of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work for employees.(iii) “Supervisor” means an individual having authority, in the interest of the applicant, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or responsibility to direct them or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if, in connection with the foregoing, the exercise of that authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.(6) Provide the applicant’s valid seller’s permit number issued pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or indicate that the applicant is currently applying for a seller’s permit.(7) Provide any other information required by the department.(8) For an applicant seeking a cultivation license, provide a statement declaring the applicant is an “agricultural employer,” as defined in the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975 (Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 1140) of Division 2 of the Labor Code), to the extent not prohibited by law.(9) Pay all applicable fees required for licensure by the department.(10) Provide proof of a bond to cover the costs of destruction of cannabis or cannabis products if necessitated by a violation of this division. The costs of destruction include, but are not limited to, all administrative, investigatory, and enforcement costs incurred by the department.(11) (A) Provide a statement, upon initial application and application for renewal, that the applicant employs, or will employ within one year of receiving or renewing a license, one supervisor and one employee who have successfully completed a Division of Occupational Safety and Health 30-hour general industry outreach course offered by a training provider that is authorized by an OSHA Training Institute Education Center to provide the course. This paragraph shall not be construed to alter or amend existing requirements for employers to provide occupational safety and health training to employees.(B) An applicant with only one employee shall not be subject to subparagraph (A).(C) For purposes of this paragraph “employee” has the same meaning as provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5) and “supervisor” has the same meaning as provided in clause (iii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (5).(b) An applicant shall also include in the application a detailed description of the applicant’s operating procedures for all of the following, as required by the department:(1) Cultivation.(2) Extraction and infusion methods.(3) The transportation process.(4) Inventory procedures.(5) Quality control procedures.(6) Security protocols.(7) For applicants seeking licensure to cultivate, the source or sources of water the applicant will use for cultivation, as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 26060.1. For purposes of this paragraph, “cultivation” as used in Section 26060.1 shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 26001. The department shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife in the implementation of this paragraph.(c) The applicant shall also provide a complete detailed diagram of the proposed premises wherein the license privileges will be exercised, with sufficient particularity to enable ready determination of the bounds of the premises, showing all boundaries, dimensions, entrances and exits, interior partitions, walls, rooms, and common or shared entryways, and include a brief statement or description of the principal activity to be conducted therein, and, for licenses permitting cultivation, measurements of the planned canopy, including aggregate square footage and individual square footage of separate cultivation areas, if any, roads, water crossings, points of diversion, water storage, and all other facilities and infrastructure related to the cultivation.(d) Provide a complete list of every person with a financial interest in the person applying for the license as required by the department. For purposes of this subdivision, “persons with a financial interest” does not include persons whose only interest in a licensee is an interest in a diversified mutual fund, blind trust, or similar instrument.SEC. 35. Section 26067 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26067. (a) The department shall establish a track and trace program for reporting the movement of cannabis and cannabis products throughout the distribution chain that utilizes a unique identifier and is capable of providing information that captures, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The licensee from which the product originates and the licensee receiving the product.(2) The transaction date.(3) The unique identifier or identifiers for the cannabis or cannabis product.(4) The date of retail sale to a customer and whether the sale is conducted on the retail premises or by delivery.(5) Information relating to cannabis and cannabis products leaving the licensed premises in a delivery vehicle as determined by regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26068.(b) (1) The department, in consultation with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall create an electronic system containing the electronic shipping manifests to facilitate the administration of the track and trace program, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(A) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis or cannabis products shipped.(B) The estimated times of departure and arrival.(C) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis or cannabis products received.(D) The actual time of departure and arrival.(E) A categorization and the unique identifier of the cannabis or cannabis product.(F) The license number issued by the department for all licensees involved in the shipping process, including, but not limited to, cultivators, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers.(2) The electronic system shall be designed to flag irregularities for the department to investigate.(3) The department and state and local agencies may, at any time, inspect shipments and request documentation for current inventory.(4) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall have read access to the electronic system for the purpose of taxation and regulation of cannabis and cannabis products.(5) Information received and contained in records kept by the department for the purposes of administering this chapter are confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except as necessary for authorized employees of the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this division or a local ordinance.(6) Upon the request of a state or local law enforcement agency, the department shall allow access to or provide information contained within the electronic system to assist law enforcement in their duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.SEC. 35.5. Section 26067 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26067. (a) The department shall establish a track and trace program for reporting the movement of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products throughout the distribution chain that utilizes a unique identifier and is capable of providing information that captures, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The licensee or industrial hemp cultivator from which the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product originates and the licensee receiving the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.(2) The transaction date.(3) The unique identifier or identifiers for the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.(4) The date of retail sale to a customer and whether the sale is conducted on the retail premises or by delivery.(5) Information relating to cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products leaving the licensed premises in a delivery vehicle as determined by regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26068.(6) The destruction of any cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product. (b) (1) The department, in consultation with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall create an electronic system containing the electronic shipping manifests to facilitate the administration of the track and trace program, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(A) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shipped.(B) The estimated times of departure and arrival.(C) The variety and quantity or weight of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products received.(D) The actual time of departure and arrival.(E) A categorization and the unique identifier of the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.(F) The license number issued by the department for all licensees involved in the shipping process, including, but not limited to, cannabis cultivators, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers.(2)  The electronic system shall be designed to flag irregularities for the department to investigate.(3) The department and state and local agencies may, at any time, inspect shipments and request documentation for current inventory.(4) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall have read access to the electronic system for the purpose of taxation and regulation of cannabis and cannabis products.(5) Information received and contained in records kept by the department for the purposes of administering this chapter are confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except as necessary for authorized employees of the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this division or a local ordinance.(6) Upon the request of a state or local law enforcement agency, the department shall allow access to or provide information contained within the electronic system to assist law enforcement in their duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.SEC. 36. Section 44831 of the Education Code is amended to read:44831. The governing board of a school district shall employ persons in public school service requiring certification qualifications as provided in this code, except that the governing board or a county office of education may contract with or employ an individual who holds a license issued by the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board and has earned a master’s degree in communication disorders to provide speech and language services if that individual meets the requirements of Section 44332.6 before employment or execution of the contract.SEC. 37. Section 94834 of the Education Code is amended to read:94834. “Distance education” means transmission of instruction to students at a location separate from the faculty.SEC. 38. Section 94866 of the Education Code is amended to read:94866. “Teach-out” means the arrangements an institution makes for its students to complete their educational programs when the institution or an educational program ceases to operate.SEC. 39. Section 94880.1 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 40. Section 94897 of the Education Code is amended to read:94897. An institution shall not do any of the following:(a) Use, or allow the use of, any reproduction or facsimile of the Great Seal of the State of California on a diploma.(b) Promise or guarantee employment, or otherwise overstate the availability of jobs upon graduation.(c) Advertise concerning job availability, degree of skill, or length of time required to learn a trade or skill unless the information is accurate and not misleading.(d) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, without including the fact that the educational programs are delivered by means of distance education if the educational programs are so delivered.(e) Advertise, or indicate in promotional material, that the institution is accredited, unless the institution has been accredited by an accrediting agency.(f) Solicit students for enrollment by causing an advertisement to be published in “help wanted” columns in a magazine, newspaper, or publication, or use “blind” advertising that fails to identify the institution.(g) Offer to compensate a student to act as an agent of the institution with regard to the solicitation, referral, or recruitment of any person for enrollment in the institution, except that an institution may award a token gift to a student for referring an individual, provided that the gift is not in the form of money, no more than one gift is provided annually to a student, and the gift’s cost is not more than one hundred dollars ($100).(h) Pay any consideration to a person to induce that person to sign an enrollment agreement for an educational program.(i) Use a name in any manner improperly implying any of the following:(1) The institution is affiliated with any government agency, public or private corporation, agency, or association if it is not, in fact, thus affiliated.(2) The institution is a public institution.(3) The institution grants degrees, if the institution does not grant degrees.(j) In any manner make an untrue or misleading change in, or untrue or misleading statement related to: a test score, grade or record of grades, attendance record, record indicating student completion, placement, employment, salaries, or financial information; a financial report filed with the bureau; information or records relating to the student’s eligibility for student financial aid at the institution; or any other record or document required by this chapter or by the bureau.(k) Willfully falsify, destroy, or conceal any document of record while that document of record is required to be maintained by this chapter.(l) Use the terms “approval,” “approved,” “approval to operate,” or “approved to operate” without stating clearly and conspicuously that approval to operate means compliance with state standards as set forth in this chapter. An institution may not state or imply either of the following:(1) The institution or its educational programs are endorsed or recommended by the state or by the bureau.(2) The approval to operate indicates that the institution exceeds minimum state standards as set forth in this chapter.(m) Direct any individual to do any of the following:(1) Perform an act that violates this chapter.(2) Refrain from reporting unlawful conduct to the bureau or another government agency.(3) Engage in any unfair act to persuade a student not to complain to the bureau or another government agency.(n) Compensate an employee involved in recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students on the basis of a commission, commission draw, bonus, quota, or other similar method related to the recruitment, enrollment, admissions, student attendance, or sales of educational materials to students, except as provided in paragraph (1) or (2):(1) If the educational program is scheduled to be completed in 90 days or less, the institution shall pay compensation related to a particular student only if that student completes the educational program.(2) For institutions participating in the federal student financial aid programs, this subdivision shall not prevent the payment of compensation to those involved in recruitment, admissions, or the award of financial aid if those payments are in conformity with federal regulations governing an institution’s participation in the federal student financial aid programs.(o) Require a prospective student to provide personal contact information in order to obtain, from the institution’s internet website, educational program information that is required to be contained in the school catalog or any information required pursuant to the consumer information requirements of Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, and any amendments thereto.(p) Offer an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree without disclosing to prospective students before enrollment whether the institution or the degree program is unaccredited and any known limitation of the degree, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states.(2) A statement that reads: “A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.”(3) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal financial aid programs.(q) In any manner commit fraud against, or make a material untrue or misleading statement to, a student or prospective student under the institution’s authority or the pretense or appearance of the institution’s authority.(r) Charge or collect any payment for institutional charges that are not authorized by an executed enrollment agreement.(s) Violate Section 1788.93 of the Civil Code.(t) Require a prospective, current, or former student or employee to sign a nondisclosure agreement pertaining to their relationship to, or experience with, the institution, except that an institution may use a nondisclosure agreement to protect the institution’s intellectual property and trade secrets. Any nondisclosure agreement in violation of this section is void and not enforceable at law or in equity.(u) Fail to maintain policies related to compliance with this chapter or adhere to the institution’s stated policies.SEC. 41. Section 94900 of the Education Code is amended to read:94900. (a) An institution shall maintain records of the name, address, e-mail address, and telephone number of each student who is enrolled in an educational program in that institution.(b) An institution shall maintain, for each student granted a degree or certificate by that institution, complete and accurate permanent records of all of the following:(1) The degree or certificate granted and the date on which that degree or certificate was granted.(2) The courses and units on which the certificate or degree was based.(3) The grades earned by the student in each of those courses.SEC. 42. Section 94902 of the Education Code is amended to read:94902. (a) A student shall enroll solely by means of executing an enrollment agreement. The enrollment agreement shall be signed by the student and by an authorized employee of the institution.(b) An enrollment agreement is not enforceable unless all of the following requirements are met:(1) The student has received the institution’s current catalog and School Performance Fact Sheet prior to signing the enrollment agreement.(2) At the time of the execution of the enrollment agreement, the institution held a valid approval to operate.(3) Prior to the execution of the enrollment agreement, the student and the institution have signed and dated the information required to be disclosed in the School Performance Fact Sheet pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 94910. Each of these items in the School Performance Fact Sheet shall include a line for the student to initial and shall be initialed and dated by the student.(c) A student shall receive a copy of the signed enrollment agreement, in writing or electronically, regardless of whether total charges are paid by the student.SEC. 43. Section 94909 of the Education Code is amended to read:94909. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), before enrollment, an institution shall provide a prospective student, either in writing or electronically, with a current school catalog containing, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) The name, address, telephone number, and, if applicable, internet website address of the institution.(2) Except as specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 94802), a statement that the institution is a private institution and that it is approved to operate by the bureau.(3) The following statements:(A) “Any questions a student may have regarding this catalog that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).”(B) “As a prospective student, you are encouraged to review this catalog before signing an enrollment agreement. You are also encouraged to review the School Performance Fact Sheet, which must be provided to you before signing an enrollment agreement.”(C) “A student or any member of the public may file a complaint about this institution with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by completing a complaint form, which can be obtained on the bureau’s internet website (internet website address).”(D) “The Office of Student Assistance and Relief is available to support prospective students, current students, or past students of private postsecondary educational institutions in making informed decisions, understanding their rights, and navigating available services and relief options. The office may be reached by calling (toll-free telephone number) or by visiting (internet website address).”(4) The address or addresses where class sessions will be held.(5) A description of the programs offered and a description of the instruction provided in each of the courses offered by the institution, the requirements for completion of each program, including required courses, any final tests or examinations, any required internships or externships, and the total number of credit hours, clock hours, or other increments required for completion.(6) If the educational program is designed to lead to positions in a profession, occupation, trade, or career field requiring licensure in this state, a notice to that effect and a list of the requirements for eligibility for licensure.(7) Information regarding the faculty and their qualifications.(8) A detailed description of institutional policies in the following areas:(A) Admissions policies, including the institution’s policies regarding the acceptance of credits earned at other institutions or through challenge examinations and achievement tests, and a list describing any transfer or articulation agreements between the institution and any other college or university that provides for the transfer of credits earned in the program of instruction. If the institution has not entered into an articulation or transfer agreement with any other college or university, the institution shall disclose that fact.(B) Cancellation, withdrawal, and refund policies, including an explanation that the student has the right to cancel the enrollment agreement and obtain a refund of charges paid through attendance at the first class session, or the seventh day after enrollment, whichever is later. The text shall also include a description of the procedures that a student is required to follow to cancel the enrollment agreement or withdraw from the institution and obtain a refund consistent with the requirements of Article 13 (commencing with Section 94919).(C) Probation and dismissal policies.(D) Attendance policies.(E) Leave-of-absence policies.(9) The schedule of total charges for a period of attendance and an estimated schedule of total charges for the entire educational program.(10) A statement reporting whether the institution participates in federal and state financial aid programs, and if so, all consumer information that is required to be disclosed to the student pursuant to the applicable federal and state financial aid programs.(11) A statement specifying that, if a student obtains a loan to pay for an educational program, the student will have the responsibility to repay the full amount of the loan plus interest, less the amount of any refund, and that, if the student has received federal student financial aid funds, the student is entitled to a refund of the moneys not paid from federal student financial aid program funds.(12) A statement specifying whether the institution has a pending petition in bankruptcy, is operating as a debtor in possession, has filed a petition within the preceding five years, or has had a petition in bankruptcy filed against it within the preceding five years that resulted in reorganization under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.).(13) If the institution provides placement services, a description of the nature and extent of the placement services.(14) A description of the student’s rights and responsibilities with respect to the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall specify that it is a state requirement that a student who pays the student’s tuition is required to pay a state-imposed assessment for the Student Tuition Recovery Fund. This statement shall also describe the purpose and operation of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund and the requirements for filing a claim against the Student Tuition Recovery Fund.(15) The following statement: “NOTICE CONCERNING TRANSFERABILITY OF CREDITS AND CREDENTIALS EARNED AT OUR INSTITUTIONThe transferability of credits you earn at (name of institution) is at the complete discretion of an institution to which you may seek to transfer. Acceptance of the (degree, diploma, or certificate) you earn in (name of educational program) is also at the complete discretion of the institution to which you may seek to transfer. If the (credits or degree, diploma, or certificate) that you earn at this institution are not accepted at the institution to which you seek to transfer, you may be required to repeat some or all of your coursework at that institution. For this reason you should make certain that your attendance at this institution will meet your educational goals. This may include contacting an institution to which you may seek to transfer after attending (name of institution) to determine if your (credits or degree, diploma, or certificate) will transfer.” (16) A statement specifying whether the institution, or any of its degree programs, are accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education. If the institution is unaccredited and offers an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree, or is accredited and offers an unaccredited program for an associate, baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree, the statement shall disclose the known limitations of the degree program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Whether a graduate of the degree program will be eligible to sit for the applicable licensure exam in California and other states or become certified or registered as required for the applicable profession, occupation, trade, or career field in California.(B) A degree program that is unaccredited or a degree from an unaccredited institution is not recognized for some employment positions, including, but not limited to, positions with the State of California.(C) That a student enrolled in an unaccredited institution is not eligible for federal financial aid programs.(b) If the institution has a general student brochure, the institution shall provide that brochure to the prospective student before enrollment. In addition, if the institution has a program-specific student brochure for the program in which the prospective student seeks to enroll, the institution shall provide the program-specific student brochure to the prospective student before enrollment.(c) An institution shall provide the school catalog to any person upon request. In addition, if the institution has student brochures, the institution shall disclose the requested brochures to any interested person upon request.(d) An accredited institution is not required to provide a School Performance Fact Sheet to a prospective student who is not a California resident, not residing in California at the time of the student’s enrollment, and enrolling in an accredited distance learning degree program offered by the institution, if the institution complies with all federal laws, the applicable laws of the state where the student is located, and other appropriate laws, including, but not limited to, consumer protection and student disclosure requirements.SEC. 44. Section 94910 of the Education Code is amended to read:94910. Except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 94909 and Section 94910.5, prior to enrollment, an institution shall provide a prospective student with a current School Performance Fact Sheet containing, at a minimum, the following information, as it relates to the educational program:(a) Completion rates, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).(b) Placement rates for each educational program, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928), if the educational program is designed to lead to, or the institution makes any express or implied claim related to preparing students for, a recognized career, occupation, vocation, job, or job title.(c) License examination passage rates for programs leading to employment for which passage of a state licensing examination is required, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).(d) Salary or wage information, as calculated pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).(e) If a program is too new to provide data for any of the categories listed in this subdivision, the institution shall state on its fact sheet: “This program is new. Therefore, the number of students who graduate, the number of students who are placed, or the starting salary you can earn after finishing the educational program are unknown at this time. Information regarding general salary and placement statistics may be available from government sources or from the institution, but is not equivalent to actual performance data.”(f) All of the following:(1) A description of the manner in which the figures described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are calculated or a statement informing the reader of where they may obtain a description of the manner in which the figures described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, are calculated.(2) A statement informing the reader of where they may obtain from the institution a list of the employment positions determined to be within the field for which a student received education and training for the calculation of job placement rates as required by subdivision (b).(3) A statement informing the reader of where they may obtain from the institution a list of the objective sources of information used to substantiate the salary disclosure as required by subdivision (d).(g) The following statements:(1) “This fact sheet is filed with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education. Regardless of any information you may have relating to completion rates, placement rates, starting salaries, or license exam passage rates, this fact sheet contains the information as calculated pursuant to state law.”(2) “Any questions a student may have regarding this fact sheet that have not been satisfactorily answered by the institution may be directed to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website), (telephone and fax numbers).”(h) If the institution participates in federal financial aid programs, the most recent three-year cohort default rate reported by the United States Department of Education for the institution and the percentage of enrolled students receiving federal student loans.(i) Data and information disclosed pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, is not required to include students who satisfy the qualifications specified in subdivision (d) of Section 94909, but an institution shall disclose whether the data, information, or both provided in its fact sheet excludes students pursuant to this subdivision. An institution shall not actively use data specific to the fact sheet in its recruitment materials or other recruitment efforts of students who are not California residents and do not reside in California at the time of their enrollment.SEC. 45. Section 94929.9 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 46. Section 94949 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 47. Section 14132.55 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14132.55. For the purposes of reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program, a speech pathologist or audiologist shall be licensed by the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board or similarly licensed by a comparable agency in the state in which they practice. Licensed speech-language pathologists or licensed audiologists are authorized to utilize and shall be reimbursed for the services of those personnel in the process of completing requirements under the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 48. Section 1.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 27 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Senate Bill 775. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 27 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 775, in which case Section 1 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 49. Section 34.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 8. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 8, in which case Section 34 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 50. Section 35.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 26067 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 8. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 26067 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 8, in which case Section 35 of this bill shall not become operative.